Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-804
Materiel division; powers and duties.

The division shall:

(1) Establish by rules and regulations a process for resolving complaints from both vendors and state agencies;

(2) Maintain a record and written justification of purchases as follows:

(a) A list of and explanation for emergency purchases;

(b) A list of open market purchases made by the division; and

(c) A list of all purchases waived from the minimum time period requirement between bid advertisement and bid opening; and

(3) Have the authority to enter into joint purchasing agreements with political subdivisions in the state.

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 30;

R.S.1943, (2014), § 81-1118.05;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 4.